California statutes. Probate Code
A violation by the trustee of any duty that the trustee owes the beneficiary is a breach of trust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16401.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the trustee is not liable to the beneficiary for the acts or omissions of an agent.

(b) Under any of the circumstances described in this subdivision, the trustee is liable to the beneficiary for an act or omission of an agent employed by the trustee in the administration of the trust that would be a breach of the trust if committed by the trustee:

(1) Where the trustee directs the act of the agent.

(2) Where the trustee delegates to the agent the authority to perform an act that the trustee is under a duty not to delegate.

(3) Where the trustee does not use reasonable prudence in the selection of the agent or the retention of the agent selected by the trustee.

(4) Where the trustee does not periodically review the agent’s overall performance and compliance with the terms of the delegation.

(5) Where the trustee conceals the act of the agent.

(6) Where the trustee neglects to take reasonable steps to compel the agent to redress the wrong in a case where the trustee knows of the agent’s acts or omissions.

(c) The liability of a trustee for acts or omissions of agents that occurred before July 1, 1987, is governed by prior law and not by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 63, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

16402.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a trustee is not liable to the beneficiary for a breach of trust committed by a cotrustee.

(b) A trustee is liable to the beneficiary for a breach committed by a cotrustee under any of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the trustee participates in a breach of trust committed by the cotrustee.

(2) Where the trustee improperly delegates the administration of the trust to the cotrustee.

(3) Where the trustee approves, knowingly acquiesces in, or conceals a breach of trust committed by the cotrustee.

(4) Where the trustee negligently enables the cotrustee to commit a breach of trust.

(5) Where the trustee neglects to take reasonable steps to compel the cotrustee to redress a breach of trust in a case where the trustee knows or has information from which the trustee reasonably should have known of the breach.

(c) The liability of a trustee for acts or omissions of a cotrustee that occurred before July 1, 1987, is governed by prior law and not by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16403.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a successor trustee is not liable to the beneficiary for a breach of trust committed by a predecessor trustee.

(b) A successor trustee is liable to the beneficiary for breach of trust involving acts or omissions of a predecessor trustee in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the successor trustee knows or has information from which the successor trustee reasonably should have known of a situation constituting a breach of trust committed by the predecessor trustee and the successor trustee improperly permits it to continue.

(2) Where the successor trustee neglects to take reasonable steps to compel the predecessor trustee to deliver the trust property to the successor trustee.

(3) Where the successor trustee neglects to take reasonable steps to redress a breach of trust committed by the predecessor trustee in a case where the successor trustee knows or has information from which the successor trustee reasonably should have known of the predecessor trustee’s breach.

(c) The liability of a trustee for acts or omissions of a predecessor trustee that occurred before July 1, 1987, is governed by prior law and not by this section.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Remedies for Breach of Trust [16420. - 16421.]

16420.

(a) If a trustee commits a breach of trust, or threatens to commit a breach of trust, a beneficiary or cotrustee of the trust may commence a proceeding for any of the following purposes that is appropriate:

(1) To compel the trustee to perform the trustee’s duties.

(2) To enjoin the trustee from committing a breach of trust.

(3) To compel the trustee to redress a breach of trust by payment of money or otherwise.

(4) To appoint a receiver or temporary trustee to take possession of the trust property and administer the trust.

(5) To remove the trustee.

(6) Subject to Section 18100, to set aside acts of the trustee.

(7) To reduce or deny compensation of the trustee.

(8) Subject to Section 18100, to impose an equitable lien or a constructive trust on trust property.

(9) Subject to Section 18100, to trace trust property that has been wrongfully disposed of and recover the property or its proceeds.

(b) The provision of remedies for breach of trust in subdivision (a) does not prevent resort to any other appropriate remedy provided by statute or the common law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16421.

The remedies of a beneficiary against the trustee are exclusively in equity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Measure of Liability for Breach of Trust [16440. - 16442.]

16440.

(a) If the trustee commits a breach of trust, the trustee is chargeable with any of the following that is appropriate under the circumstances:

(1) Any loss or depreciation in value of the trust estate resulting from the breach of trust, with interest.

(2) Any profit made by the trustee through the breach of trust, with interest.

(3) Any profit that would have accrued to the trust estate if the loss of profit is the result of the breach of trust.

(b) If the trustee has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the trustee, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the trustee in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16441.

(a) If the trustee is liable for interest pursuant to Section 16440, the trustee is liable for the greater of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of interest that accrues at the legal rate on judgments in effect during the period when the interest accrued.

(2) The amount of interest actually received.

(b) If the trustee has acted reasonably and in good faith under the circumstances as known to the trustee, the court, in its discretion, may excuse the trustee in whole or in part from liability under subdivision (a) if it would be equitable to do so.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 77, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

16442.

The provisions in this article for liability of a trustee for breach of trust do not prevent resort to any other remedy available under the statutory or common law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Limitations and Exculpation [16460. - 16465.]

16460.

(a) Unless a claim is previously barred by adjudication, consent, limitation, or otherwise:

(1) If a beneficiary has received an interim or final account in writing, or other written report, that adequately discloses the existence of a claim against the trustee for breach of trust, the claim is barred as to that beneficiary unless a proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within three years after receipt of the account or report. An account or report adequately discloses existence of a claim if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary knows of the claim or reasonably should have inquired into the existence of the claim.

(2) If an interim or final account in writing or other written report does not adequately disclose the existence of a claim against the trustee for breach of trust or if a beneficiary does not receive any written account or report, the claim is barred as to that beneficiary unless a proceeding to assert the claim is commenced within three years after the beneficiary discovered, or reasonably should have discovered, the subject of the claim.

(b) For the purpose of subdivision (a), a beneficiary is deemed to have received an account or report, as follows:

(1) In the case of an adult who is reasonably capable of understanding the account or report, if it is received by the adult personally.

(2) In the case of an adult who is not reasonably capable of understanding the account or report, if it is received by the person’s legal representative, including a guardian ad litem or other person appointed for this purpose.

(3) In the case of a minor, if it is received by the minor’s guardian or, if the minor does not have a guardian, if it is received by the minor’s parent so long as the parent does not have a conflict of interest.

(c) A written account or report under this section may, but need not, satisfy the requirements of Section 16061 or 16063 or any other provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 862, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

16461.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), (c), or (d), the trustee can be relieved of liability for breach of trust by provisions in the trust instrument.

(b) A provision in the trust instrument is not effective to relieve the trustee of liability (1) for breach of trust committed intentionally, with gross negligence, in bad faith, or with reckless indifference to the interest of the beneficiary, or (2) for any profit that the trustee derives from a breach of trust.

(c) Subject to subdivision (b), a provision in a trust instrument that releases the trustee from liability if a beneficiary fails to object to an item in an interim or final account or other written report within a specified time period is effective only if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The account or report sets forth the item.

(2) The period specified in the trust instrument for the beneficiary to object is not less than 180 days, or the trustee elects to follow the procedure provided in subdivision (d).

(3) Written notice in 12-point boldface type is provided to a beneficiary with the account or report in the following form:

NOTICE TO BENEFICIARIES

YOU HAVE [insert “180 days” or the period specified in the trust instrument, whichever is longer] FROM YOUR RECEIPT OF THIS ACCOUNT OR REPORT TO MAKE AN OBJECTION TO ANY ITEM SET FORTH IN THIS ACCOUNT OR REPORT. ANY OBJECTION YOU MAKE MUST BE IN WRITING; IT MUST BE DELIVERED TO THE TRUSTEE WITHIN THE PERIOD STATED ABOVE; AND IT MUST STATE YOUR OBJECTION. YOUR FAILURE TO DELIVER A WRITTEN OBJECTION TO THE TRUSTEE WITHIN THE PERIOD STATED ABOVE WILL PERMANENTLY PREVENT YOU FROM LATER ASSERTING THIS OBJECTION AGAINST THE TRUSTEE. IF YOU DO MAKE AN OBJECTION TO THE TRUSTEE, THE THREE-YEAR PERIOD PROVIDED IN SECTION 16460 OF THE PROBATE CODE FOR COMMENCEMENT OF LITIGATION WILL APPLY TO CLAIMS BASED ON YOUR OBJECTION AND WILL BEGIN TO RUN ON THE DATE THAT YOU RECEIVE THIS ACCOUNT OR REPORT.

(d) A provision in a trust instrument that provides for a period less than 180 days to object to an item in an account or report shall be ineffective to release the trustee from liability. A trustee of a trust created by an instrument with an ineffective period may elect to be governed by the provisions of subdivision (c) by complying with the requirements of subdivision (c), except that “180 days” shall be substituted in the notice form for the ineffective period.

(e) Subject to subdivision (b), a beneficiary who fails to object in writing to an account or report that complies with the requirements of subdivision (c) within the specified, valid period shall be barred from asserting any claim against the trustee regarding an item that is adequately disclosed in the account or report. An item is adequately disclosed if the disclosure regarding the item meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16460.

(f) Except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 16460, the trustee may not be released from liability as to any claim based on a written objection made by a beneficiary if the objection is delivered to the trustee within the specified, effective period. If a beneficiary has filed a written objection to an account or report that complies with the requirements of subdivision (c) within the specified, valid period that concerns an item that affects any other beneficiary of the trust, any affected beneficiary may join in the objection anytime within the specified, valid period or while the resolution of the objection is pending, whichever is later. This section is not intended to establish a class of beneficiaries for actions on an account and report or provide that the action of one beneficiary is for the benefit of all beneficiaries. This section does not create a duty for any trustee to notify beneficiaries of objections or resolution of objections.

(g) Provided that a beneficiary has filed a written objection to an account or report that complies with the requirements of subdivision (c) within the specified, valid period, a supplemental written objection may be delivered in the same manner as the objection not later than 180 days after the receipt of the account or report or no later than the period specified in the trust instrument, whichever is longer.

(h) Compliance with subdivision (c) excuses compliance with paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 16063 for the account or report to which that notice relates.

(i) Subject to subdivision (b), if proper notice has been given and a beneficiary has not made a timely objection, the trustee is not liable for any other claims adequately disclosed by any item in the account or report.

(j) Subdivisions (c) to (i), inclusive, apply to all accounts and reports submitted after the effective date of the act adding these subdivisions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 538, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

16462.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 16461, a trustee of a revocable trust is not liable to a beneficiary for any act performed or omitted pursuant to written directions from the person holding the power to revoke, including a person to whom the power to direct the trustee is delegated.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to a trust that is revocable in part with respect to the interest of the beneficiary in that part of the trust property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16463.

(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c), a beneficiary may not hold the trustee liable for an act or omission of the trustee as a breach of trust if the beneficiary consented to the act or omission before or at the time of the act or omission.

(b) The consent of the beneficiary does not preclude the beneficiary from holding the trustee liable for a breach of trust in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the beneficiary was under an incapacity at the time of the consent or of the act or omission.

(2) Where the beneficiary at the time consent was given did not know of his or her rights and of the material facts (A) that the trustee knew or should have known and (B) that the trustee did not reasonably believe that the beneficiary knew.

(3) Where the consent of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the trustee.

(c) Where the trustee has an interest in the transaction adverse to the interest of the beneficiary, the consent of the beneficiary does not preclude the beneficiary from holding the trustee liable for a breach of trust under any of the circumstances described in subdivision (b) or where the transaction to which the beneficiary consented was not fair and reasonable to the beneficiary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16464.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a beneficiary may be precluded from holding the trustee liable for a breach of trust by the beneficiary’s release or contract effective to discharge the trustee’s liability to the beneficiary for that breach.

(b) A release or contract is not effective to discharge the trustee’s liability for a breach of trust in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Where the beneficiary was under an incapacity at the time of making the release or contract.

(2) Where the beneficiary did not know of his or her rights and of the material facts (A) that the trustee knew or reasonably should have known and (B) that the trustee did not reasonably believe that the beneficiary knew.

(3) Where the release or contract of the beneficiary was induced by improper conduct of the trustee.

(4) Where the transaction involved a bargain with the trustee that was not fair and reasonable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

16465.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), if the trustee, in breach of trust, enters into a transaction that the beneficiary may at his or her option reject or affirm, and the beneficiary affirms the transaction, the beneficiary shall not thereafter reject it and hold the trustee liable for any loss occurring after the trustee entered into the transaction.

(b) The affirmance of a transaction by the beneficiary does not preclude the beneficiary from holding a trustee liable for a breach of trust if, at the time of the affirmance, any of the following circumstances existed:

(1) The beneficiary was under an incapacity.

(2) The beneficiary did not know of his or her rights and of the material facts (A) that the trustee knew or reasonably should have known and (B) that the trustee did not reasonably believe that the beneficiary knew.

(3) The affirmance was induced by improper conduct of the trustee.

(4) The transaction involved a bargain with the trustee that was not fair and reasonable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1990, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Notice of Proposed Action by Trustee [16500. - 16504.]

16500.

Subject to subdivision (d) of Section 16501, a trustee may give a notice of proposed action regarding a matter governed by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 16200) or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 16320) as provided in this chapter. For the purpose of this chapter, a proposed action includes a course of action or a decision not to take action. This chapter does not preclude an application or assertion of any other rights or remedies available to an interested party as otherwise provided in this part regarding an action to be taken or not to be taken by the trustee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 54, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.

(a) The trustee who elects to provide notice pursuant to this chapter shall deliver notice pursuant to Section 1215 of the proposed action to each of the following:

(1) A beneficiary who is receiving, or is entitled to receive, income under the trust, including a beneficiary who is entitled to receive income at the discretion of the trustee.

(2) A beneficiary who would receive a distribution of principal if the trust were terminated at the time the notice is given.

(b) Notice of proposed action is not required to be given to a person who consents in writing to the proposed
 action. The consent may be executed at any time before or after the proposed action is taken.

(c) A trustee is not required to provide a copy of the notice of proposed action to a beneficiary who is known to the trustee but who cannot be located by the trustee after reasonable diligence or who is unknown to the trustee.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the trustee may not use a notice of proposed action in any of the following actions:

(1) Allowance of the trustee’s compensation.

(2) Allowance of compensation of the attorney for the trustee.

(3) Settlement of
 accounts.

(4) Discharge of the trustee.

(5) Sale of property of the trust to the trustee or to the attorney for the trustee.

(6) Exchange of property of the trust for property of the trustee or for property of the attorney for the trustee.

(7) Grant of an option to purchase property of the trust to the trustee or to the attorney for the trustee.

(8) Allowance, payment, or compromise of a claim of the trustee, or the attorney for the trustee, against the trust.

(9) Compromise or settlement of a claim, action, or proceeding by the trust
 against the trustee or against the attorney for the trust.

(10) Extension, renewal, or modification of the terms of a debt or other obligation of the trustee, or the attorney for the trustee, owing to or in favor of the trust.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 91.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16502.

The notice of proposed action shall state that it is given pursuant to this section and shall include all of the following:

(a) The name, mailing address, and electronic address of the trustee.

(b) The name, telephone number, and electronic address of a person who may be contacted for additional information.

(c) A description of the action proposed to be taken and an explanation of the reasons for the action.

(d) The time within which objections to the proposed action can be made, which
 shall be at least 45 days from the delivery or receipt of the notice of proposed action.

(e) The date on or after which the proposed action may be taken or is effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 92.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16503.

(a) A beneficiary may object to the proposed action by delivering a written objection pursuant to Section 1215 to the trustee at the address stated in the notice of proposed action within the time period specified in the notice of proposed action.

(b) A trustee is not liable to a beneficiary for an action regarding a matter governed by this part if the trustee does not receive a written objection to the proposed action from a beneficiary within the applicable period and the other requirements of this section are satisfied. If no beneficiary entitled to notice objects under this section, the trustee is not liable to any current or future beneficiary with
 respect to the proposed action. This subdivision does not apply to a person who is a minor or an incompetent adult at the time of receiving the notice of proposed action unless the notice is served on a guardian or conservator of the estate of the person.

(c) If the trustee receives a written objection within the applicable period, either the trustee or a beneficiary may petition the court to have the proposed action taken as proposed, taken with modifications, or denied. In the proceeding, a beneficiary objecting to the proposed action has the burden of proving that the trustee’s proposed action should not be taken. A beneficiary who has not objected is not estopped from opposing the proposed action in the proceeding.

(d) If the trustee decides not to implement the proposed action, the
 trustee shall notify the beneficiaries of the decision not to take the action and the reasons for the decision, and the trustee’s decision not to implement the proposed action does not itself give rise to liability to any current or future beneficiary. A beneficiary may petition the court to have the action taken, and has the burden of proving that it should be taken.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 93.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

16504.

This chapter does not require a trustee to use these procedures prior to taking any action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 54, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. California Uniform Directed Trust Act [16600. - 16632.]

16600.

(a) This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Uniform Directed Trust Act.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) This chapter governs an arrangement commonly known as a directed trust.

(2) In a directed trust, the terms of the trust grant a person other than a trustee a power over some aspect of the trust’s administration.

(3) Under this chapter, this power is called a power of direction, the person that holds the power is called a trust
 director, a trustee that is subject to the power is called a directed trustee, and the trust is a directed trust.

(4) A directed trustee is required to take reasonable action to comply with a trust director’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction.

(5) Except for willful misconduct, a directed trustee is liable only for its own breach of trust in executing a direction and not for the trust director’s breach of trust in exercising or not exercising the power of direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16602.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Breach of trust” includes a violation by a trust director or trustee of a duty imposed on that director or trustee by the terms of the trust, this chapter, or law of this state other than this chapter pertaining to trusts.

(b) “Directed trust” means a trust for which the terms of the trust grant a power of direction.

(c) “Directed trustee” means a trustee that is subject to a trust director’s power of direction.

(d) “Power of
 direction” means a power over a trust granted to a person by the terms of the trust to the extent the power is exercisable while the person is not serving as a trustee. Power of direction includes a power over the investment, management, or distribution of trust property or other matters of trust administration. The term excludes the powers described in subdivision (a) of Section 16606.

(e) “Settlor” means a person, including a testator, who creates, or contributes property to, a trust. If more than one person creates or contributes property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust property attributable to that person’s contribution except to
 the extent another person has the power to revoke or withdraw that portion.

(f) “Terms of a trust” means either of the following:

(1) The manifestation of the settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s provisions as expressed in the trust instrument or established by other evidence that has been admitted in a judicial proceeding.

(2) The trust’s provisions as established, determined, or amended by a trustee or trust director in accordance with applicable law, the exercise of a power of appointment in accordance with applicable law, a court order, or other binding modification, including, but not limited to, under Section 15404.

(g) “Trust director” means a person that is
 granted a power of direction by the terms of a trust, to the extent the power is exercisable while the person is not serving as a trustee. The person is a trust director whether or not the terms of the trust refer to the person as a trust director and whether or not the person is a beneficiary or settlor of the trust.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16604.

(a) This chapter applies to a trust, whenever created, that has its principal place of administration in this state, subject to all of the following rules:

(1) If the trust was created before January 1, 2024, this chapter applies only to a decision or action occurring on or after that date.

(2) If the principal place of administration of the trust is changed to this state on or after January 1, 2024, this chapter applies only to a decision or action occurring on or after the date of the change.

(b) Without precluding other means to establish a sufficient connection
 with the designated jurisdiction in a directed trust, terms of the trust that designate the principal place of administration of the trust are valid and controlling if all of the following are met:

(1) A trustee’s principal place of business is located in, or a trustee is a resident of, the designated jurisdiction.

(2) A trust director’s principal place of business is located in, or a trust director is a resident of, the designated jurisdiction.

(3) All or part of the administration occurs in the designated jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16605.

Notwithstanding any other law, the consent of the public administrator, public guardian, or public conservator is required before they may be appointed to act as a trust director or directed trustee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16606.

(a) This chapter does not apply to any of the following:

(1) A power of appointment.

(2) The power to appoint or remove a trustee or trust director.

(3) The power of a settlor over a trust, to the extent the settlor has a power to revoke the trust.

(4) The power of a beneficiary over a trust, to the extent the exercise or nonexercise of the power affects the beneficial interest of the beneficiary.

(5) The power over a trust if
 both of the following apply:

(A) The terms of the trust provide that the power is held in a nonfiduciary capacity.

(B) The power is required to be held in a nonfiduciary capacity to achieve the settlor’s tax objectives under the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and regulations issued thereunder.

(b) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, a power granted to a person to designate a recipient of an ownership interest in, or power of appointment over, trust property that is exercisable while the person is not serving as a trustee is a power of appointment and not a power of direction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16608.

(a) Subject to Section 16610, the terms of a trust may grant a power of direction to a trust director.

(b) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, a trust director may exercise any further power appropriate to the exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction granted to the trust director pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, trust directors with joint powers shall act by majority decision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16610.

A trust director is subject to the same rules as a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances in the exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further power under subdivision (b) of Section 16608 regarding either of the following:

(a) A payback provision in the terms of a trust necessary to comply with the reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law in Section 1917 of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1396p(d)(4)(A)) and regulations issued thereunder.

(b) A charitable interest in the trust, including notice regarding the interest to the Attorney General.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16612.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), with respect to a power of direction or further power under subdivision (b) of Section 16608, both of the following apply:

(1) A trust director has the same fiduciary duty and liability in the exercise or nonexercise of the power, if the power is held individually, as a sole trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances or, if the power is held jointly with a trustee or another trust director, as a cotrustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

(2) The terms of the trust may vary the trust director’s duty or liability to the same extent the
 terms of the trust could vary the duty or liability of a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

(b) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, if a trust director is licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or permitted by law other than this chapter to provide health care in the ordinary course of the trust director’s business or practice of a profession, to the extent the trust director acts in that capacity, the trust director has no duty or liability under this chapter.

(c) The terms of a trust may impose a duty or liability on a trust director in addition to the duties and liabilities under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16614.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a directed trustee shall take reasonable action to comply with a trust director’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further power under subdivision (b) of Section 16608, and the trustee is not liable for the action.

(b) A directed trustee shall not comply with a trust director’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further power under subdivision (b) of Section 16608 to the extent that, by complying, the trustee would engage in willful misconduct.

(c) An exercise of a power of direction under which a trust director may release a trustee or
 another trust director from liability for breach of trust is not effective if any of the following is true:

(1) The breach involved the trustee’s or other trust director’s willful misconduct.

(2) The release was induced by improper conduct of the trustee or other trust director in procuring the release.

(3) At the time of the release, the trust director did not know the material facts relating to the breach.

(d) A directed trustee that has reasonable doubt about their duty under this section may petition the court for instructions.

(e) The terms of a trust may impose a duty or liability on a directed
 trustee in addition to the duties and liabilities under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16616.

(a) Subject to Section 16618, a trustee shall provide information to a trust director to the extent the information is reasonably related both to the powers or duties of the trustee and the powers or duties of the trust director.

(b) Subject to Section 16618, a trust director shall provide information to a trustee or another trust director to the extent the information is reasonably related both to the powers or duties of the trust director and the powers or duties of the trustee or other trust director.

(c) A trustee that acts in reliance on information provided by a trust director is not liable for a
 breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trustee engages in willful misconduct.

(d) A trust director that acts in reliance on information provided by a trustee or another trust director is not liable for a breach of trust to the extent the breach resulted from the reliance, unless by so acting the trust director engages in willful misconduct.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16618.

(a) (1) Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, a trustee does not have a duty to do either of the following:

(A) Monitor a trust director.

(B) Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or trust director concerning an instance in which the trustee might have acted differently than the trust director.

(2) By taking an action described in paragraph (1), a trustee does not assume the duty excluded by paragraph (1).

(b) (1) Unless
 the terms of a trust provide otherwise, a trust director does not have a duty to do either of the following:

(A) Monitor a trustee or another trust director.

(B) Inform or give advice to a settlor, beneficiary, trustee, or another trust director concerning an instance in which the trust director might have acted differently than a trustee or another trust director.

(2) By taking an action described in paragraph (1), a trust director does not assume the duty excluded by paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16620.

The terms of a trust may relieve a cotrustee from duty and liability with respect to another cotrustee’s exercise or nonexercise of a power of the other cotrustee to the same extent that, in a directed trust, a directed trustee is relieved from duty and liability with respect to a trust director’s power of direction under Sections 16614, 16616, and 16618.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16622.

(a) An action against a trust director for breach of trust shall be commenced within the same limitation period as in Section 16460 for an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

(b) A report or accounting has the same effect on the limitation period for an action against a trust director for breach of trust that the report or accounting would have under Section 16460 in an action for breach of trust against a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16624.

In an action against a trust director for breach of trust, the director may assert the same defenses a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances could assert in an action for breach of trust against the trustee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16626.

(a) By accepting appointment as a trust director of a trust subject to this chapter, the trust director submits to personal jurisdiction of the courts of this state regarding any matter related to a power or duty of the trust director.

(b) This section does not preclude other methods of obtaining jurisdiction over a trust director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16628.

Unless the terms of a trust provide otherwise, the rules applicable to a trustee apply to a trust director regarding all of the following matters:

(a) Acceptance under Sections 15600 and 15601.

(b) Giving of a bond to secure performance under Section 15602.

(c) Reasonable compensation under Section 15681.

(d) Resignation or removal under Article 3 (commencing with Section 15640) of Chapter 1.

(e) Vacancy and appointment of a successor under Section 15660.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16630.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 721, Sec. 3.   (SB 801)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16632.
